Hawaii statutes.
§183D-26 Hunting on private lands
prohibited. (a) No person shall enter upon any land or premises belonging
to, held, or occupied by another, for the purpose of hunting or to take any
kind of wildlife including game without first having obtained permission from
the owner or a duly appointed agent, if the owner is the occupier or holder, or
if the owner has let another occupy or hold the same, without having first
obtained the permission of the occupier or holder thereof, or the duly
appointed agent of the occupier or holder.

(b) No prosecution shall be brought under this
section, except upon the sworn complaint of the owner, occupier, or holder of
the land or premises, or a duly appointed agent, or if the owner, occupier, or
holder is either a corporation or a partnership, then the complaint shall be
sworn to by an officer of the corporation or by one of the members of the
partnership. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next